Mississippi statutes. Title 5. Legislative Department
Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review

§ 5-3-51.
Creation of committee; general purpose.

A committee of the senate and house of representatives to be known as a joint legislative committee on performance evaluation and expenditure review, (hereinafter committee), is hereby created for the purpose of conducting performance evaluations, investigations and examinations of expenditures and all records, relating thereto, of any agency at any time as the committee deems necessary. Provided further the committee shall perform a complete audit of all funds expended by the highway department. The committee shall submit its findings, conclusions and reports to the Mississippi legislature no later than the first day of the second full week of each regular session of the legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-53.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 5-3-51 through 5-3-69, the following words and phrases have the following meanings unless the context otherwise requires:

“Performance evaluation” shall mean an examination of the effectiveness of the administration, its sufficiency and its adequacy in terms of the programs of the agency authorized by law to be performed. Such examinations shall include, but not be limited to:

How effectively the programs are administered.

Benefits of each program in relation to the expenditures.

Goals of programs.

Development of indicators by which the success or failure of a program may be gauged.

Review conformity of programs with legislative intent.

Assist interim committee dealing with specific programs.

Impact of federal grant-in-aid programs on agency programs.

“Agency” shall mean an agency, department, bureau, division, authority, commission, office or institution, educational or otherwise, of the State of Mississippi, or any political subdivision thereof which shall include all county governments and agencies thereof, all city governments and agencies thereof, and all public school districts and agencies thereof.

“Expenditure review” shall mean an examination made at some point after the completion of a transaction or group of transactions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-55.
Membership and organization of committee.

The committee shall be composed of seven (7) members from the Senate and seven (7) members from the House of Representatives, one (1) from each of the congressional districts of the State of Mississippi as they currently exist and three (3) from the state at large, to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and the Speaker of the House of Representatives for a term concurrent with their term in their respective house. For the remainder of the present term, the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker shall make their respective appointments within fifteen (15) days after sine die adjournment of the 2004 Regular Session; and for each full four-year term thereafter, the Lieutenant Governor and Speaker shall make their appointments within fifteen (15) days after the first calendar day of the regular session in the first year of such four-year term. The term of each member shall be concurrent with his term of office.

The committee shall meet no later than ten (10) days after the final day of the 2004 Regular Session, and annually thereafter, for the purpose of organizing by electing from the membership a chairman, vice chairman and secretary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2004).

§ 5-3-57.
Powers of committee.

The committee shall have the following powers:

To conduct, in any manner and at any time deemed appropriate, a performance evaluation of all agencies. It may examine or investigate the budget, files, financial statements, records, documents or other papers of the agency deemed necessary by the committee.

To conduct, in any manner and at any time deemed appropriate, a review of the budget, files, financial statements, records, documents or other papers, as deemed necessary by the committee, of any agency; to make selected review of any funds expended and programs previously projected by such agency; to investigate any and all salaries, fees, obligations, loans, contracts, or other agreements or other fiscal function or activity of any official or employee thereof (including independent contractors where necessary); and to do any and all things necessary and incidental to the purposes specifically set forth in this section.

To conduct an investigation of all agencies which are in whole or in part operated or supported by any appropriation or grant of state funds, or which are in whole or in part supported or operated by any funds derived from any state-wide tax, license fee, or permit fee or which collects or administers any state-wide tax, license fee, or permit fee by whatever name called; such committee shall also have full and complete authority to investigate all laws administered and enforced by any such offices, departments, agencies, institutions and instrumentalities, and the manner and method of the administration and enforcement of such laws; to investigate any evasion of any state-wide tax, privilege fee or license fee; to investigate all disbursements of public funds by any office, agency, department, institution or instrumentality specified herein; to study the present laws relative to such agencies, offices, departments, institutions and instrumentalities, and the laws providing for the levying or imposition and collection of any state tax, privilege fee or license fee; to make recommendations to the legislature as to the correction of any imperfections, inequalities or injustices found to exist in any of such laws, and to do any and all things necessary and incidental to the purposes herein specifically set forth. Provided further that the committee shall upon petition by one-half the elected membership of either the Senate or House of Representatives perform a complete investigation and audit of any agency, entity or group subject to investigation or audit by passage of Sections 5-3-51 through 5-3-69.

The committee, in its discretion, if it determines that such action is necessary to carry out the responsibilities of Sections 5-3-51 through 5-3-69, may employ an attorney or attorneys to file or assist the attorney general’s office in filing actions for the recovery of any funds discovered to have been misused or misappropriated and to prosecute or assist in prosecution of criminal violations, if any, revealed or discovered in the discharging of their duties and responsibilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-59.
Subpoena and examination of witnesses.

The committee, while in the discharge of official duties, shall have the following additional powers:

To subpoena and examine witnesses; to require the appearance of any person and the production of any paper or document; to order the appearance of any person for the purpose of producing any paper or document; and to issue all process necessary to compel such appearance or production. When such process has been served, the committee may compel obedience thereto by the attachment of the person, papers or records subpoenaed; and if any person shall wilfully refuse to appear before such committee or to produce any paper or record in obedience to any process issued by the committee and served on that person, he shall be guilty of contempt of the legislature and shall be prosecuted and punished as provided by law.

To administer oaths to witnesses appearing before the committee when, by a majority vote, the committee deems the administration of an oath necessary and advisable as provided by law.

To determine that a witness has perjured himself by testifying falsely before the committee, and to institute penal proceedings as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-61.
Issuance of performance evaluation and expenditure review reports.

The committee shall issue performance evaluation reports and expenditure review reports, favorable or unfavorable, of any agency examined, and such reports shall be a public record. A copy of the report, signed by the chairman of the committee, including committee recommendations, shall be submitted to the governor, to each member of the legislature, and to the official, officer, or person in charge of the agency examined.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-63.
Recording testimony under oath.

Whenever making a performance evaluation or an expenditure review, the committee may require that testimony be given under oath, which may be administered by the chairman or by any person authorized by law to administer oaths, and may require that such testimony be recorded by an official court reporter or deputy, or by some other competent person, under oath, which report, when written and certified and approved by such person as being the direct transcript of the testimony, proceedings, or documents, expenditure review or performance evaluation, shall be prima facie a correct statement of said testimony, proceedings or documents, provided that such person’s signature to such certificate be duly acknowledged by him before a notary public or some judicial official of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-65.
Legal assistance; other employees.

The attorney general, or a designated assistant attorney general, appointed by him, the state auditor and the director of the state department of audit shall assist the committee in whatever manner the committee deems that such officers can be helpful. Furthermore, the committee is authorized to employ one full time secretary, other stenographic help, technical experts, auditors, investigators and other employees which may be necessary to enable it to carry out the provisions therein. The committee is authorized at its discretion to fix reasonable compensation for its employees including necessary travel expenses; and it shall maintain and provide a full, complete and itemized record of all such expenditures.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 19, 1973).

§ 5-3-67.
Compensation and expenses.

Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, provided that they shall be entitled to per diem compensation as is authorized by Section 25-3-69 for each day occupied with the discharge of official duties as members of the committee plus the expense allowance equal to the maximum daily expense rate allowable to employees of the federal government for travel in the high rate geographical area of Jackson, Mississippi, as may be established by federal regulations, per day, including mileage as authorized by Section 25-3-41. However, no committee member shall be authorized to receive reimbursement for expenses, including mileage, or per diem compensation unless such authorization appears in the minutes of the committee and is signed by the chairman or vice chairman. The members of the committee shall not receive per diem or expenses while the Legislature is in session. However, members may receive the per diem and expenses authorized by this section when the Legislature is in session but in recess under the terms of a concurrent resolution, or in recess during an extraordinary session. All expenses incurred by and on behalf of the committee shall be paid from a sum to be provided in equal portion from the contingency funds of the Senate and House of Representatives.

The committee staff and employees or contract organizations employed by the committee may continue at the discretion of the committee any investigations, audits or performance evaluation during the time the Legislature is in session.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 9; Laws, 1980, ch. 560, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 483, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2009).

§ 5-3-69.
Quorum; meetings.

There shall be no business transacted, including adoption of rules or procedure, without the presence of a quorum of the committee, which shall be eight (8) members to consist of four (4) members from the Senate and four (4) members from the House of Representatives, and no action shall be valid unless approved by the majority of those members present and voting, and entered upon the minutes of the committee and signed by the chairman and vice chairman. All actions of the committee shall be approved by at least four (4) Senate members and four (4) House members.

The committee shall meet at the time and place as designated by the majority vote of the members, provided that a special meeting may be called by the chairman or by a petition signed by no less than five (5) members. No action taken by the committee at any special meeting shall be valid unless each member shall have been given at least forty-eight hours’ notice of the meeting, along with a statement of the business to be considered, and unless such action be entered upon the minutes of the committee and signed by the chairman.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 331, § 10; Laws, 2004, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 20, 2004).

§ 5-3-71.
Committee to evaluate executive branch of state government; reports.

The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall evaluate the economy, efficiency and effectiveness of the executive branch of state government as it is affected by the implementation of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Chapter 544, Laws of 1989].”

On October 1, 1989, the Fiscal Management Board or its successor shall report to PEER the following information:

A listing of all agencies in the executive branch of state government before and after the reorganization, regardless of whether they are affected by “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”;

A description of the number, organizational location, and cost savings associated with employment positions eliminated as a direct result of the passage of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”;

A complete accounting of all projected or actual costs or savings associated with reorganization, including transition costs;

Performance measures that can be used to determine the effectiveness of each program affected by the reorganization prior to and following the implementation of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”, which may be the same as performance measures developed for purposes of preparing program budgets; and

Administrative changes or other provisions that have been made to improve the delivery of services. Upon receipt of this report, the PEER Committee shall conduct a hearing or hearings to assist it in evaluating the initial impact of the implementation of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”.

On February 1, 1990, PEER shall report to the Legislature on the initial impact of the reorganization provided for in “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”.

On October 1, 1990, the Fiscal Management Board or its successor shall report to PEER any changes in the information presented in the report required in Subsection (2) of this section. Upon receipt of this report, the PEER Committee shall conduct a hearing or hearings to assist it in evaluating the final impact of the implementation of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”.

On February 1, 1991, PEER shall report to the Legislature the final evaluation of the economy, efficiency and effectiveness of the executive branch of state government as it is affected by the implementation of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989”.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 167, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 5-3-72.
Committee to biennially evaluate procurement process used by state agencies; report.

The Joint Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall evaluate on a biennial basis the procurement process utilized by all state agencies, including, but not limited to, the contract review, reporting and recordkeeping requirements in Section 25-9-120, and the bid requirements in Section 31-7-13. Upon completion of its evaluation, the PEER Committee shall submit a report to the Legislature with recommendations for improving the procurement process. The Department of Finance and Administration and the Personal Service Contract Review Board shall cooperate with the PEER Committee to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 431, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 5-3-73.
Federal unfunded mandates; short title.

This section and Section 5-3-79 shall be known and may be cited as the “Federal Unfunded Mandates Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§§ 5-3-75, 5–3–77.
Reserved.

Before December 1, 1996, the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall complete an assessment of the implementation and cost of current federal mandates. In its evaluation, the committee shall consider the relationship between the requirements and implementation of the federal mandates and state policy. In addition, the evaluation shall identify those federal mandates that the committee believes are encroaching on the state's authority under the Tenth Amendment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 428, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 5-3-79.
Federal unfunded mandates; evaluation of implementation and cost of current mandates.